Illinois, session 104th, SB1208.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5adding Section 42 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/42 new)7    Sec. 42. Reciprocity.8    (a) Notwithstanding the licensing provisions of this Act, 9a non-resident may carry a handgun in accordance with this Act 10if the non-resident:11        (1) is 21 years of age or older;12        (2) has in his or her immediate possession a valid 13    license or permit that authorizes him or her to carry a 14    concealed firearm issued to him or her by a state whose 15    license or permit is recognized by the Illinois State 16    Police under subsection (b) of this Section;17        (3) is not a resident of the State of Illinois; and18        (4) is a legal resident of the United States.19    (b) The Illinois State Police shall recognize a permit or 20license issued by a state whose requirements to obtain a 21permit or license are substantially similar to the training 22requirements in Section 75 of this Act and to non-residents of 23contiguous states where a reciprocal agreement has been   SB1208- 2 -LRB104 03876 RLC 13900 b1entered into. The Illinois State Police shall enter into a 2reciprocal agreement with the contiguous state of Iowa, 3Missouri, Wisconsin, Indiana, or Kentucky, if that state 4recognizes Illinois concealed carry licenses.5    (c) A non-resident is subject to the same laws and 6restrictions with respect to carrying a handgun as a resident 7who is licensed under this Act.8    (d) If a resident of another state who is the holder of a 9valid license or permit to carry a concealed firearm issued by 10another state recognized by the Illinois State Police under 11subsection (b), establishes legal residence in this State, the 12license or permit shall be valid in this State for 90 days 13following the date on which the holder of the license or permit 14establishes legal residence in this State. For the purposes of 15this subsection (d), the person may establish legal residence 16in this State by:17        (1) registering to vote;18        (2) obtaining an Illinois driver's license or State 19    identification card; or20        (3) filing for a homestead tax exemption on property 21    in this State. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.